Washington statutes.
RCW 11.40.130

Judgment against decedent—Execution barred upon decedent's death—Presentation—Sale of property.

If a judgment was entered against the decedent during the decedent's lifetime, an execution may not issue on the judgment after the death of the decedent. The judgment must be presented in the manner provided in RCW 11.40.070, but if the judgment is a lien on any property of the decedent, the property may be sold for the satisfaction of the judgment and the officer making the sale shall account to the personal representative for any surplus.

[ 1997 c 252 s 19; 1965 c 145 s 11.40.130. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 119; RRS s 1489; prior: Code 1881 s 1479; 1854 p 292 s 91.]

NOTES:

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.